Utah statutes.
34-23-103.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Casual work" is employment on an incidental, occasional, or nonregular basis which is not considered full-time or routine.

(2)  "Commission" means the Labor Commission.

(3)  "Division" means the Division of Antidiscrimination and Labor in the commission.

(4)  "Hazardous occupation" is any occupation defined as hazardous by the United States Department of Labor under 29 U.S.C. Sec. 201 et seq., the Fair Labor Standards Act.

(5)  "Minor" is a person under the age of 18 years.

